Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4016
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Sexual Predator Residency Restriction
Act:

(1) Child care facility means a facility licensed pursuant
to the Child Care Licensing Act;

(2) Political subdivision means a village, a city, a county,
a school district, a public power district, or any other unit of local government;

(3) School means a public, private, denominational, or parochial
school which meets the requirements for accreditation or approval prescribed
in Chapter 79;

(4) Sex offender means an individual who has been convicted
of a crime listed in section 29-4003 and who is required to register as a
sex offender pursuant to the Sex Offender Registration Act; and

(5) Sexual predator means an individual who is required to
register under the Sex Offender Registration Act, who has committed an aggravated offense as defined in section 29-4001.01, and
who has victimized a person eighteen years of age or younger.

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 28;

Laws 2009, LB285, § 12.

Child Care Licensing Act, see section 71-1908.

Sex Offender Registration Act, see section 29-4001.